Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB249.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 212 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 212. Responsibilities of State and local law enforcement agencies.* * *(h) Release of identification.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), a law enforcement agency shall make a reasonable effort to contact a surviving family member of a direct victim of murder or 123456789101112131415161718192021 intervenor before publicly releasing the identification of the direct victim or intervenor.(2) A law enforcement agency may publicly release the identification of a direct victim of murder or intervenor without notification of the death to a surviving family member if the release is necessary for the investigation of the murder.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0249PN0201 - 2 - 12345678